Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-1631
Repealed. Laws 2026, LB803, § 29. Operative date January 1, 2027. Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Property Tax Request Act:

(1) Allowable growth percentage means a percentage equal to the sum of (a) two percent plus (b) the political subdivision's real growth percentage;

(2) Property tax request means the total amount of property taxes requested to be raised for a political subdivision through the levy imposed pursuant to section 77-1601, excluding the amount to be levied for the payment of principal or interest on bonds issued or authorized to be issued by a school district;

(3) Real growth percentage means the percentage obtained by dividing (a) the political subdivision's real growth value by (b) the political subdivision's total property valuation from the prior year; and

(4) Real growth value means the increase in a political subdivision's total property valuation from the prior year to the current year due to (a) improvements to real property as a result of new construction and additions to existing buildings, (b) any other improvements to real property which increase the value of such property, (c) annexation of real property by the political subdivision, (d) a change in the use of real property, (e) any increase in personal property valuation over the prior year, and (f) the accumulated excess valuation over the redevelopment project valuation described in section 18-2147 of the Community Development Law for redevelopment projects within the political subdivision in the year immediately after the division of taxes for such redevelopment project has ended.

Laws 2021, LB644, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 49;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 32.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.